ko: 비즈니스/산업 > 의료 > 의료 장비 > 환자 리프트: 욕조 리프트; 이동식 리프트; 스탠드업 환자 리프트
pt-BR: Comercial e industrial > Medicina > Equipamento médico > Elevador de pacientes: Elevadores de banho; Elevadores móveis; Elevadores de pacientes em pé
fi: Yritys ja teollisuus > Lääketiede > Lääketieteelliset laitteet > Potilasnostimet: Kylpyhissit; Siirrettävät hissit; Pystyasentoiset potilasnostimet
lt-LT: Verslas ir pramonė > Medicina > Medicinos įranga > Pacientų keltuvai: Vonios keltuvai; Mobilūs keltuvai; Stovimieji pacientų keltuvai
vi: Kinh doanh & Công nghiệp > Y tế > Thiết bị y tế > Thiết bị nâng bệnh nhân: Ghê nâng bồn tắm; Xe nâng di động; Thiết bị nâng bệnh nhân đứng thẳng
hu: Üzlet és ipar > Orvosi > Orvosi berendezések > Betegfelvonók: Fürdőfelvonók; Mobil felvonók; Állóbeteg-felvonók
sv: Företag och industri > Sjukvård > Medicinsk utrustning > Patienthissar: Badlyftanordningar; Mobila lyftanordningar; Stående patientlyft
cs: Obchod a průmysl > Zdravotnictví > Zdravotnické vybavení > Zařízení pro zvedání pacientů: Vanové výtahy; Mobilní výtahy; Závěsy pro zvedání pacientů
pl: Biznes i przemysł > Branża medyczna > Sprzęt medyczny > Podnośniki pacjenta: Podnośniki kąpielowe; Windy mobilne; Podnośniki pionizujące pacjenta
es: Economía e industria > Productos médicos > Equipo médico > Grúas ortopédicas: Elevadores de bañera; Elevadores móviles; Elevadores de pacientes de pie
el: Επιχειρηματικός & βιομηχανικός εξοπλισμός > Ιατρικά είδη > Ιατρικός εξοπλισμός > Ανυψωτήρες ασθενών: Ανυψωτήρες μπανιέρας; Κινητοί ανυψωτήρες; Ανυψωτήρες ασθενών για όρθια στάση
sl-SI: Posel in industrija > Zdravstvo > Medicinska oprema > Bolniška dvigala: Dvigala za kopalno kad; Mobilna dvigala; Dvigala za premeščanje bolnika
it: Commercio e industria > Medicina > Apparecchiature mediche > Sollevatori per pazienti: Sollevatore da vasca; Sollevatore mobile; Sollevatori per pazienti verticali
ja: ビジネス・産業 > 医療 > 医療機器 > 介護用リフト: バスリフト; 移動用リフト; 立ち上がり患者リフト
en: Business & Industrial > Medical > Medical Equipment > Patient Lifts: Bath Lifts; Mobile Lifts; Stand-Up Patient Lifts
fr: Entreprise et industrie > Secteur médical > Équipement médical > Lève-personnes: Élévateurs de bain; Élévateurs mobiles; Lève-personnes debout
pt-PT: Business e industrial > Médico > Equipamento médico > Elevadores de pacientes: Elevadores de banho; Elevadores móveis; Elevadores de pacientes em pé
nb: Forretninger og industri > Medisinsk > Medisinsk utstyr > Pasientløftere: Badeheiser; Mobilheiser; Stående pasientløftere
ru: Бизнес и промышленность > Медицина > Медицинское оборудование > Подъемники для пациентов: Подъемники для ванны; Мобильные подъемники; Подъемники-вертикализаторы
sk-SK: Obchod a priemysel > Zdravotníctvo > Zdravotnícke vybavenie > Zdviháky pacientov: Vaňové zdviháky; Mobilné zdviháky; Zdviháky pacienta v stoji
tr: İş ve Endüstri > Medikal > Medikal Ekipmanlar > Hasta Kaldırıcılar: Banyo Asansörleri; Mobil Asansörler; Ayakta Hasta Kaldırıcılar
zh-TW: 商業與各產業 > 醫療業 > 醫療設備 > 病患移位機: 沐浴升降機; 移動式升降機; 站立式病患移位機
bg-BG: Бизнес и промишленост > Медицински > Медицинско оборудване > Асансьори за пациенти: Асансьори за баня; Мобилни асансьори; Пациентски лифтери
de: Wirtschaft & Industrie > Medizinischer Bereich > Medizinische Geräte > Patientenlifter: Badelifte; Mobile Lifte; Aufrechte Patientenheber
ro-RO: Afaceri și sectorul industrial > Sectorul medical > Echipamente medicale > Dispozitive de ridicare pentru pacienți: Dispozitive de ridicare pentru baie; Dispozitive de ridicare mobile; Dispozitive de ridicare în picioare pentru pacienți
nl: Zakelijk en industrieel > Medisch > Medische apparatuur > Patiëntenliften: Badliften; Mobiele liften; Staande patiëntenliften
da: Erhverv og industri > Medicinsk > Medicinsk udstyr > Patientlifte: Badelifte; Mobillifte; Opretstående patientlifte
hr-HR: Posao i industrija > Medicina > Medicinska oprema > Dizala za pacijente: Dizala za kadu; Mobilna dizala; Dizala za pacijente u stojećem položaju
zh-CN: 商业/工业 > 医疗 > 医疗器械 > 患者升降机: 沐浴升降机; 移动式升降机; 站立式患者升降机
th: ธุรกิจและอุตสาหกรรม > การแพทย์ > อุปกรณ์ทางการแพทย์ > ที่ยกตัวคนไข้: ลิฟท์อ่างอาบน้ำ; ลิฟท์เคลื่อนที่; ที่ยกตัวคนไข้แบบตั้งตรง